Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2585.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4(d) and (e) of the act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968, are amended to read:Section 4. Minimum Wages.--Except as may otherwise be provided under this act:* * *[(d) An employe whose earning capacity is impaired by physical or mental deficiency or injury may be paid less than the applicable minimum wage if either a license specifying a wage rate commensurate with the employe's productive capacity 1234567891011121314151617181920 has been obtained by the employer from the secretary or a Federal certificate is obtained under section 14(c) of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (52 Stat. 1060, 29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.). A license obtained from the secretary shall be granted only upon joint application of employer and employe.](e) In lieu of the minimum wage prescribed in subsection (a) and section 5(c) and notwithstanding [subsections (b) and (d),] subsection (b), an employer may, during the first sixty calendar days when an employe under the age of twenty years is initially employed, pay the employe training wages at a rate of not less than the minimum wage set forth in section 6(a) of the Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. § 206(a)). A person employed at the training wage under this subsection shall be informed of the amount of the training wage and the right to receive the full minimum wage, or a higher wage, upon completion of the training period. No employer may take any action to displace existing employes, including partial displacements such as reduction in the hours, wages or employment benefits of existing employes, for purposes of hiring individuals at the training wage authorized by this subsection.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2585PN3495 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021